Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 4

Legislative Guidelines for Correctional Policy

41-1-401. Legislative findings.

In order to maintain continuity relative to present and future correctional policy in Tennessee and to provide a framework to guide present and future correction administrations when making policy decisions, the general assembly finds that a statutorily determined policy regarding certain important correctional issues is essential.

The general assembly also encourages the department to initiate innovative programs, administrative policy and management techniques designed to operate the correctional system with maximum benefit at minimum cost and potential for violence as long as the policies and techniques are consistent with the framework of legislative intent established by this part.

Acts 1983, ch. 467, § 1.

41-1-402. Labor of inmates.

The intent of the general assembly regarding the labor of inmates within the correctional system is as follows:

All inmates within the correctional system, except those designated by a judge, warden or medical personnel as being either too dangerous to society or physically unable, shall be required to perform some type of work. The general policy that all inmates be required to work should not be construed to apply to those inmates housed temporarily in classification centers;

Where possible, the labor should be directed toward projects such as the manufacture or production of building materials, the production of items that are of practical use to state and local governments, the production of as much food and clothing for use by the correctional system as possible or the construction, renovation or repair of prison facilities to the extent that security and inmate skills permit;

Inmates not engaged in work activities pursuant to subdivision (2) and who are determined to be acceptable security risks should be utilized to perform work that might not otherwise be performed for state and local governments or nonprofit or charitable organizations. The tasks would include land reclamation, repairing rural dams, maintaining drainage ditches, cleaning cemeteries, painting public buildings and schools or other such tasks. Unless a judge, warden or medical personnel has determined, either by reason of public safety or physical incapacity, that an inmate should not work, the commissioner has the discretion to determine which inmates are acceptable security risks to perform work projects outside of department of correction facilities or property;

Other departments of state government, particularly transportation and environment and conservation, shall cooperate with the department of correction in the utilization of inmate labor for projects within the departments that are of value, but because of a lack of funds or personnel, might not otherwise be performed. The commissioner of correction, with the advice of the appropriate department commissioner, has the authority to restrict the use of inmate labor in certain areas and at such times as the commissioner determines to be necessary for the public safety or convenience; and

In addition to the intent of the general assembly set out in this section regarding inmate labor at the various correctional institutions, educational opportunities, particularly those teaching the basic skills, should be available at all institutions except the classification centers.

Acts 1983, ch. 467, § 2.

Cross-References. Road work by prisoners, § 41-2-123.

Work programs, title 41, ch. 22.

Work programs, participation required, exceptions, § 41-2-150

41-1-403. Classification system.

A sound classification system is necessary for an efficient and manageable correctional system. Because of its importance, the general assembly declares the following policy:

The classification system shall provide a meaningful case evaluation of each inmate prior to permanent placement and a continuing review and reclassification process throughout the inmate's period of incarceration;

The commissioner of correction has the discretion to determine the institutional location of inmates within the various security classifications; and

All information compiled by the department pertaining to an inmate shall be readily available to the entity having authority for the inmate's release.

Acts 1983, ch. 467, § 3.

41-1-404. Alternatives in sentencing.

The general assembly finds that the following policy statements regarding the criminal justice system are of importance to the state correction system:

Trial judges are encouraged to use alternatives to incarceration as long as the alternatives include requirements of reparation or victim compensation; and

Trial judges shall be provided a presentence report with sufficient information to make a proper evaluation and disposition of a defendant.

Acts 1983, ch. 467, § 4.

Cross-References. Criminal injuries compensation, title 29, ch. 13.

Procedure for imposing sentences, title 40, ch. 35, part 2.

Restitution, title 41, ch. 6.

41-1-405. Impact on local correction systems.

The general assembly finds that a continuing evaluation of the impact of the state correction system upon local correction systems is essential to determine the method and amount of assistance, financial or otherwise, necessary to equitably compensate the local systems for their continuing role in the overall correction system of this state. The evaluation may be accomplished by a task force composed of all facets of the criminal justice system.

Acts 1983, ch. 467, § 5.

41-1-406. Early release procedure.

There shall be a statutory procedure whereby the governor, in conjunction with the parole board, has the discretion to effectuate the early release of inmates in order to bring the prison population within acceptable limits.

Acts 1983, ch. 467, § 6.

Cross-References. Reduction of prison overcrowding, title 41, ch. 1, part 5.

41-1-407. Training of correctional personnel.

All state correctional personnel shall receive appropriate and adequate training in the particular skills and requirements of the duties of their job.

Acts 1983, ch. 467, § 7.

41-1-408. Medical care.

The department of correction shall provide adequate medical care, including twenty-four-hour emergency care, at all prison facilities. The department may contract with the county health department or other appropriate entities to secure trained medical personnel.

Acts 1983, ch. 467, § 8.

Cross-References. Administration of department of correction institutions, title 4, ch. 6, part 1.

Temporary retention of disabled correctional officer or youth service worker, § 4-6-148.

41-1-409. Construction of prison facilities.

If the department is planning the construction of additional state prison facilities, whether using inmate labor or otherwise, the commissioner shall determine if the requirements of applicable building or fire codes would compel additional expenses but are not necessary for the health or safety of the inmate occupants of the facility. The commissioner shall present the determinations to the state building commission, which shall approve or disapprove them.

Acts 1983, ch. 467, § 9.

41-1-410. Coordinated management philosophy.

Individual programs aimed at managing inmate behavior should be coordinated as parts of an overall management philosophy. The intent of the general assembly is to provide an environment that would allow and encourage a predictable, safe and manageable corrections system. Consistent with that intent, the department of correction should use sentence credits, educational opportunities, training, jobs and pay for inmates as coordinated parts of a consistent management philosophy.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 49; T.C.A. § 41-1-411.

Cross-References. Sentence reduction credits, § 41-21-236.

41-1-411. Adding local facilities to corrections system.

While adding local facilities may be beneficial for the total corrections system, careful consideration should be given both to the needs of the state and the needs of local governments. The state should commit to adding local facilities to meet state needs only when the facilities clearly appear to offer a more cost-effective alternative to adding state facilities over a reasonable period of time.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 50; T.C.A. § 41-1-412.

41-1-412. Development of offender reentry programs.

The trial courts and the department of correction shall coordinate efforts to prepare offenders for reentry into society. To that end, it is the intent of the general assembly that validated risks/needs assessment instruments shall be used to develop offender reentry plans.

In preparing presentence reports in accordance with § 40-35-207, the department of correction shall include information identifying the defendant’s risks and needs as determined through the use of a validated assessment instrument, along with recommended treatment programs to address the risks and needs and enhance the defendant’s opportunity for successful reentry into the community.

The department of correction shall develop an individual treatment/supervision plan for each offender in its custody or under its supervision to enhance the offender’s opportunity for successful reentry into the community. The plan shall be developed using a validated instrument to evaluate the individual risks and needs of the offender.

Acts 2009, ch. 452, § 1; 2012, ch. 727, § 54.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the transfer of certain functions relating to probation and parole services and the community correction grant program from the board of probation and parole to the department of correction, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 727.

Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 63 provided that the implementation of the act, which amended this section, shall be fully accomplished on or before January 1, 2013.

Law Reviews.

Penile Polygraphy: The Admissibility of Penile-Plethysmograph Results at Sentencing in Tennessee, 72 Vand. L. Rev. 353 (January 2019).

41-1-413. Intermediate administrative sanctions to manage and assist probationers — Revocation of authority.

When appropriate to better manage and assist probationers under their supervision, probation and parole officers employed by the department of correction shall have the authority to impose intermediate administrative sanctions, including, but not limited to, mandated participation in treatment programs designed to address an offender's risks and needs. The intermediate administrative sanctions shall be imposed in accordance with the treatment/supervision plan developed using a validated instrument to evaluate the individual risks and needs of the offender.

Trial courts may revoke the authority granted to probation and parole officers in subsection (a), by entering an order to that effect, in all cases for all defendants, in certain specified cases or for particular defendants.

Acts 2009, ch. 452, § 2; 2012, ch. 727, § 55.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the transfer of certain functions relating to probation and parole services and the community correction grant program from the board of probation and parole to the department of correction, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 727.

Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 63 provided that the implementation of the act, which amended subsection (a), shall be fully accomplished on or before January 1, 2013.